test/src/gt-norm-yamls/Prop-Oct_2016_gt-norm.yaml
      Rannu+Prop+Sg+Ess: Rannuna
      Rannu+Prop+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: Rannunagi
      Rannu+Prop+Sg+Trm: Rannuni
      Rannu+Prop+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: Rannunigi
      Rannu+Prop+Sg+Tra: Rannuks
      Rannu+Prop+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: Rannukski
      Rannu+Prop+Sg+Abl: Rannult
      Rannu+Prop+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: Rannultki
      Rannu+Prop+Sg+Ade: Rannul
      Rannu+Prop+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: Rannulgi
      Rannu+Prop+Sg+All: Rannule
      Rannu+Prop+Sg+All+Foc/gi: Rannulegi
      Rannu+Prop+Sg+Ela: Rannust
      Rannu+Prop+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: Rannustki
      Rannu+Prop+Sg+Ine: Rannus
      Rannu+Prop+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: Rannuski
      Rannu+Prop+Sg+Gen: Rannu
      Rannu+Prop+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: Rannugi
      Rannu+Prop+Sg+Par: Rannut
      Rannu+Prop+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: Rannutki
      Rannu+Prop+Pl+Nom: Rannud
      Rannu+Prop+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: Rannudki
      Rannu+Prop+Pl+Par: Rannusid
      Rannu+Prop+Pl+Ill: Rannudesse
      Rannu+Prop+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: Rannudessegi
      Rannu+Prop+Pl+Com: Rannudega
      Rannu+Prop+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: Rannudegagi
      Rannu+Prop+Pl+Abe: Rannudeta
      Rannu+Prop+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: Rannudetagi
      Rannu+Prop+Pl+Ess: Rannudena
      Rannu+Prop+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: Rannudenagi
      Rannu+Prop+Pl+Trm: Rannudeni
      Rannu+Prop+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: Rannudenigi
      Rannu+Prop+Pl+Tra: Rannudeks
      Rannu+Prop+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: Rannudekski
      Rannu+Prop+Pl+Abl: Rannudelt
      Rannu+Prop+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: Rannudeltki
      Rannu+Prop+Pl+Ade: Rannudel
      Rannu+Prop+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: Rannudelgi
      Rannu+Prop+Pl+All: Rannudele
      Rannu+Prop+Pl+All+Foc/gi: Rannudelegi
      Rannu+Prop+Pl+Ela: Rannudest
      Rannu+Prop+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: Rannudestki
      Rannu+Prop+Pl+Ine: Rannudes
      Rannu+Prop+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: Rannudeski
      Rannu+Prop+Pl+Gen: Rannude
      Rannu+Prop+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: Rannudegi
      Riia+Prop+Sg+Nom: Riia
      Riia+Prop+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: Riiagi
      Riia+Prop+Sg+Ill+Use/Rare: Riiasse
      Riia+Prop+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: Riiassegi
      Riia+Prop+Sg+Com: Riiaga
      Riia+Prop+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: Riiagagi
      Riia+Prop+Sg+Abe: Riiata
      Riia+Prop+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: Riiatagi
      Riia+Prop+Sg+Ess: Riiana
      Riia+Prop+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: Riianagi
      Riia+Prop+Sg+Trm: Riiani
      Riia+Prop+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: Riianigi
      Riia+Prop+Sg+Tra: Riiaks
      Riia+Prop+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: Riiakski
      Riia+Prop+Sg+Abl: Riialt
      Riia+Prop+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: Riialtki
      Riia+Prop+Sg+Ade: Riial
      Riia+Prop+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: Riialgi
      Riia+Prop+Sg+All: Riiale
      Riia+Prop+Sg+All+Foc/gi: Riialegi
      Riia+Prop+Sg+Ela: Riiast
      Riia+Prop+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: Riiastki
      Riia+Prop+Sg+Ine: Riias
      Riia+Prop+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: Riiaski
      Riia+Prop+Sg+Gen: Riia
      Riia+Prop+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: Riiagi
      Riia+Prop+Sg+Par: Riiat
      Riia+Prop+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: Riiatki
      Riia+Prop+Pl+Nom: Riiad
      Riia+Prop+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: Riiadki
      Riia+Prop+Pl+Par: Riiasid
      Riia+Prop+Pl+Ill: Riiadesse
      Riia+Prop+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: Riiadessegi
      Riia+Prop+Pl+Com: Riiadega
      Riia+Prop+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: Riiadegagi
      Riia+Prop+Pl+Abe: Riiadeta
      Riia+Prop+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: Riiadetagi
      Riia+Prop+Pl+Ess: Riiadena
      Riia+Prop+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: Riiadenagi
      Riia+Prop+Pl+Trm: Riiadeni
      Riia+Prop+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: Riiadenigi
      Riia+Prop+Pl+Tra: Riiadeks
      Riia+Prop+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: Riiadekski
      Riia+Prop+Pl+Abl: Riiadelt
      Riia+Prop+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: Riiadeltki
      Riia+Prop+Pl+Ade: Riiadel
      Riia+Prop+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: Riiadelgi
      Riia+Prop+Pl+All: Riiadele
      Riia+Prop+Pl+All+Foc/gi: Riiadelegi
      Riia+Prop+Pl+Ela: Riiadest
      Riia+Prop+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: Riiadestki
      Riia+Prop+Pl+Ine: Riiades
      Riia+Prop+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: Riiadeski
      Riia+Prop+Pl+Gen: Riiade
      Riia+Prop+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: Riiadegi
      Riia+Prop+Sg+Ill: Riiga
      Riia+Prop+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: Riigagi
      Schedule+Prop+Sg+Nom: Schedule
      Schedule+Prop+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: Schedulegi
      Schedule+Prop+Pl+Par: Schedule'eid
      Schedule+Prop+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: Schedule'eidki
      Schedule+Prop+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: Schedule'eisse
      Schedule+Prop+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: Schedule'eissegi
      Schedule+Prop+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: Schedule'eiks
      Schedule+Prop+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: Schedule'eikski
      Schedule+Prop+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: Schedule'eilt
      Schedule+Prop+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: Schedule'eiltki
      Schedule+Prop+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: Schedule'eil
      Schedule+Prop+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: Schedule'eilgi
      Schedule+Prop+Pl+All+Use/Rare: Schedule'eile
      Schedule+Prop+Pl+All+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: Schedule'eilegi
      Schedule+Prop+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: Schedule'eist
      Schedule+Prop+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: Schedule'eistki
      Schedule+Prop+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: Schedule'eis
      Schedule+Prop+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: Schedule'eiski
      Schedule+Prop+Sg+Ill: Schedule'isse
      Schedule+Prop+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: Schedule'issegi
      Schedule+Prop+Sg+Com: Schedule'iga
      Schedule+Prop+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: Schedule'igagi
      Schedule+Prop+Sg+Abe: Schedule'ita
      Schedule+Prop+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: Schedule'itagi
      Schedule+Prop+Sg+Ess: Schedule'ina
      Schedule+Prop+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: Schedule'inagi
      Schedule+Prop+Sg+Trm: Schedule'ini
      Schedule+Prop+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: Schedule'inigi
      Schedule+Prop+Sg+Tra: Schedule'iks
      Schedule+Prop+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: Schedule'ikski
      Schedule+Prop+Sg+Abl: Schedule'ilt
      Schedule+Prop+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: Schedule'iltki
      Schedule+Prop+Sg+Ade: Schedule'il
      Schedule+Prop+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: Schedule'ilgi
      Schedule+Prop+Sg+All: Schedule'ile
      Schedule+Prop+Sg+All+Foc/gi: Schedule'ilegi
      Schedule+Prop+Sg+Ela: Schedule'ist
      Schedule+Prop+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: Schedule'istki
      Schedule+Prop+Sg+Ine: Schedule'is
      Schedule+Prop+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: Schedule'iski
      Schedule+Prop+Sg+Gen: Schedule'i
      Schedule+Prop+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: Schedule'igi
      Schedule+Prop+Sg+Par: Schedule'it
      Schedule+Prop+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: Schedule'itki
      Schedule+Prop+Pl+Nom: Schedule'id
      Schedule+Prop+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: Schedule'idki
      Schedule+Prop+Pl+Ill: Schedule'itesse
      Schedule+Prop+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: Schedule'itessegi
      Schedule+Prop+Pl+Com: Schedule'itega
      Schedule+Prop+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: Schedule'itegagi
      Schedule+Prop+Pl+Abe: Schedule'iteta
      Schedule+Prop+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: Schedule'itetagi
      Schedule+Prop+Pl+Ess: Schedule'itena
      Schedule+Prop+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: Schedule'itenagi
      Schedule+Prop+Pl+Trm: Schedule'iteni
      Schedule+Prop+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: Schedule'itenigi
      Schedule+Prop+Pl+Tra: Schedule'iteks
      Schedule+Prop+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: Schedule'itekski
      Schedule+Prop+Pl+Abl: Schedule'itelt
      Schedule+Prop+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: Schedule'iteltki
      Schedule+Prop+Pl+Ade: Schedule'itel
      Schedule+Prop+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: Schedule'itelgi
      Schedule+Prop+Pl+All: Schedule'itele
      Schedule+Prop+Pl+All+Foc/gi: Schedule'itelegi
      Schedule+Prop+Pl+Ela: Schedule'itest
      Schedule+Prop+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: Schedule'itestki
      Schedule+Prop+Pl+Ine: Schedule'ites
      Schedule+Prop+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: Schedule'iteski
      Schedule+Prop+Pl+Gen: Schedule'ite
      Schedule+Prop+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: Schedule'itegi
      Taani+Prop+Sg+Nom: Taani
      Taani+Prop+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: Taanigi
      Taani+Prop+Sg+Ill: Taani
      Taani+Prop+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: Taanigi
      Taani+Prop+Sg+Ill+Use/Rare: Taanisse
      Taani+Prop+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: Taanissegi
      Taani+Prop+Sg+Com: Taaniga
      Taani+Prop+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: Taanigagi
      Taani+Prop+Sg+Abe: Taanita
      Taani+Prop+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: Taanitagi
      Taani+Prop+Sg+Ess: Taanina
      Taani+Prop+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: Taaninagi
      Taani+Prop+Sg+Trm: Taanini
      Taani+Prop+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: Taaninigi
      Taani+Prop+Sg+Tra: Taaniks
      Taani+Prop+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: Taanikski
      Taani+Prop+Sg+Abl: Taanilt
      Taani+Prop+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: Taaniltki
      Taani+Prop+Sg+Ade: Taanil
      Taani+Prop+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: Taanilgi
      Taani+Prop+Sg+All: Taanile
      Taani+Prop+Sg+All+Foc/gi: Taanilegi
      Taani+Prop+Sg+Ela: Taanist
      Taani+Prop+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: Taanistki
      Taani+Prop+Sg+Ine: Taanis
      Taani+Prop+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: Taaniski
      Taani+Prop+Sg+Gen: Taani
      Taani+Prop+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: Taanigi
      Taani+Prop+Sg+Par: Taanit
      Taani+Prop+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: Taanitki
      Taani+Prop+Pl+Nom: Taanid
      Taani+Prop+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: Taanidki
      Taani+Prop+Pl+Par: Taanisid
      Taani+Prop+Pl+Ill: Taanidesse
      Taani+Prop+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: Taanidessegi
      Taani+Prop+Pl+Com: Taanidega
      Taani+Prop+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: Taanidegagi
      Taani+Prop+Pl+Abe: Taanideta
      Taani+Prop+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: Taanidetagi
      Taani+Prop+Pl+Ess: Taanidena
      Taani+Prop+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: Taanidenagi
      Taani+Prop+Pl+Trm: Taanideni
      Taani+Prop+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: Taanidenigi
      Taani+Prop+Pl+Tra: Taanideks
      Taani+Prop+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: Taanidekski
      Taani+Prop+Pl+Abl: Taanidelt
      Taani+Prop+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: Taanideltki
      Taani+Prop+Pl+Ade: Taanidel
      Taani+Prop+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: Taanidelgi
      Taani+Prop+Pl+All: Taanidele
      Taani+Prop+Pl+All+Foc/gi: Taanidelegi
      Taani+Prop+Pl+Ela: Taanidest
      Taani+Prop+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: Taanidestki
      Taani+Prop+Pl+Ine: Taanides
      Taani+Prop+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: Taanideski
      Taani+Prop+Pl+Gen: Taanide
      Taani+Prop+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: Taanidegi
      York+Prop+Sg+Nom: York
      York+Prop+Sg+Nom+Foc/gi: Yorkki
      York+Prop+Pl+Par: Yorke
      York+Prop+Pl+Par+Foc/gi: Yorkegi
      York+Prop+Sg+Par: Yorki
      York+Prop+Sg+Par+Foc/gi: Yorkigi
      York+Prop+Sg+Ill: Yorki
      York+Prop+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi: Yorkigi
      York+Prop+Sg+Ill+Use/Hyp: Yorkisse
      York+Prop+Sg+Ill+Foc/gi+Use/Hyp: Yorkissegi
      York+Prop+Sg+Com: Yorkiga
      York+Prop+Sg+Com+Foc/gi: Yorkigagi
      York+Prop+Sg+Abe: Yorkita
      York+Prop+Sg+Abe+Foc/gi: Yorkitagi
      York+Prop+Sg+Ess: Yorkina
      York+Prop+Sg+Ess+Foc/gi: Yorkinagi
      York+Prop+Sg+Trm: Yorkini
      York+Prop+Sg+Trm+Foc/gi: Yorkinigi
      York+Prop+Sg+Tra: Yorkiks
      York+Prop+Sg+Tra+Foc/gi: Yorkikski
      York+Prop+Sg+Abl: Yorkilt
      York+Prop+Sg+Abl+Foc/gi: Yorkiltki
      York+Prop+Sg+Ade: Yorkil
      York+Prop+Sg+Ade+Foc/gi: Yorkilgi
      York+Prop+Sg+All: Yorkile
      York+Prop+Sg+All+Foc/gi: Yorkilegi
      York+Prop+Sg+Ela: Yorkist
      York+Prop+Sg+Ela+Foc/gi: Yorkistki
      York+Prop+Sg+Ine: Yorkis
      York+Prop+Sg+Ine+Foc/gi: Yorkiski
      York+Prop+Sg+Gen: Yorki
      York+Prop+Sg+Gen+Foc/gi: Yorkigi
      York+Prop+Pl+Nom: Yorkid
      York+Prop+Pl+Nom+Foc/gi: Yorkidki
      York+Prop+Pl+Par+Foc/gi+Use/Rare: Yorkisidki
      York+Prop+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: Yorkisid
      York+Prop+Pl+Ill: Yorkidesse
      York+Prop+Pl+Ill+Foc/gi: Yorkidessegi
      York+Prop+Pl+Com: Yorkidega
      York+Prop+Pl+Com+Foc/gi: Yorkidegagi
      York+Prop+Pl+Abe: Yorkideta
      York+Prop+Pl+Abe+Foc/gi: Yorkidetagi
      York+Prop+Pl+Ess: Yorkidena
      York+Prop+Pl+Ess+Foc/gi: Yorkidenagi
      York+Prop+Pl+Trm: Yorkideni
      York+Prop+Pl+Trm+Foc/gi: Yorkidenigi
      York+Prop+Pl+Tra: Yorkideks
      York+Prop+Pl+Tra+Foc/gi: Yorkidekski
      York+Prop+Pl+Abl: Yorkidelt
      York+Prop+Pl+Abl+Foc/gi: Yorkideltki
      York+Prop+Pl+Ade: Yorkidel
      York+Prop+Pl+Ade+Foc/gi: Yorkidelgi
      York+Prop+Pl+All: Yorkidele
      York+Prop+Pl+All+Foc/gi: Yorkidelegi
      York+Prop+Pl+Ela: Yorkidest
      York+Prop+Pl+Ela+Foc/gi: Yorkidestki
      York+Prop+Pl+Ine: Yorkides
      York+Prop+Pl+Ine+Foc/gi: Yorkideski
      York+Prop+Pl+Gen: Yorkide
      York+Prop+Pl+Gen+Foc/gi: Yorkidegi
